Arkansas, session 2025, HB1295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 19 — Healthcare Cost-Sharing Collections Transparency Act

23-99-1901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthcare
Cost-Sharing Collections Transparency Act".

23-99-1902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Contracting entity" means a healthcare insurer, or a
subcontractor, affiliate, or other entity that contracts directly or
indirectly with a healthcare provider for the delivery of healthcare services
to enrollees.
(B) "Contracting entity" includes without limitation:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A health maintenance organization;
*ANS081*
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(iii) A hospital and medical service corporation;
(iv) A preferred provider organization;
(v) A risk-based provider organization;
(vi) A third-party administrator;
(vii) A nonprofit agricultural membership
organization; and
(viii) A prescription benefit management company;
(2)(A) "Cost sharing" means the amount of the costs that are
covered by a health benefit plan for which an enrollee is financially
responsible.
(B) "Cost sharing" includes without limitation a
deductible payment, a coinsurance amount, a copayment, or other similar
charges.
(C) "Cost sharing" does not include a premium, balance
billing amount for out-of-network healthcare providers, or the cost of
noncovered services;
(3) "Enrollee" means an individual who is entitled to receive
healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(4) "Entity of the state" means an agency, board, bureau,
commission, committee, council, department, division, institution of higher
education, office, public school, quasi-public organization, or other
political subdivision of the state;
(5)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or
extended in this state by a healthcare insurer.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes a nonfederal
governmental plan as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits;
(ii) A plan that provides only eye and vision
benefits;
(iii) A disability income plan;
(iv) A credit insurance plan;
(v) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(vi) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners’ insurance plan;
(vii) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers’ Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(viii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(ix) An accident-only plan;
(x) A specified disease plan;
(xi) A policy, contract, certificate, or agreement
offered or issued by a healthcare insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including
pharmacy benefits, to an entity of the state;
(xii) A long-term care insurance plan; or
(xiii) A healthcare provider self-insured plan;
(6) "Healthcare contract" means a contract entered into,
materially amended, or renewed between a contracting entity and a healthcare
provider for the delivery of healthcare services to an enrollee;
(7)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that is authorized
by this state to offer or provide health benefit plans, policies, subscriber
contracts, or any other contracts of a similar nature that indemnify or
compensate a healthcare provider for the provision of healthcare services.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A hospital and medical service corporation;
(iii) A health maintenance organization;
(iv) A risk-based provider organization; and
(v) A nonprofit agricultural membership
organization.
(C) "Healthcare insurer" does not include:
(i) Any sponsor of a nonfederal self-funded
governmental plan in this state; or
(ii) A third-party administrator or other entity
providing claims administration services for a health benefit plan;
(8) "Healthcare provider" means a person or entity that is
licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
administer healthcare services;
(9) "Healthcare services" means services or goods provided for
the purpose of or incidental to the purpose of preventing, diagnosing,
treating, alleviating, relieving, curing, or healing human illness, disease,
condition, disability, or injury;
(10) "Medical loss ratio" means the measure used in healthcare
insurance to assess the percentage of premium dollars spent on medical claims
and quality improvements versus administrative costs;
(11) "Net premium income" means the dollar amount of direct
business plus reinsurance assumed minus reinsurance ceded; and
(12) "Premium" means the dollar amount charged for the insurance
coverage of an enrollee.

23-99-1903. Transparency and reporting.
(a)(1)(A) Annually on or before March 1, a healthcare insurer shall
file with the Insurance Commissioner a full and true statement of the
healthcare insurer's financial condition, transactions, and affairs as of the
December 31 preceding.
(B)(i) The commissioner may grant an extension of time to
file the statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section for
good cause shown.
(ii) The commissioner may grant an extension of time
for good cause under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section only if a
written application for an extension of time is received at least five (5)
business days before the filing due date.
(2) The statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section shall be prepared according to the companion National Association of
Insurance Commissioners’ Annual and Quarterly Statement Instructions, as
adopted by rule by the commissioner, and follow those accounting principles
and procedures prescribed by the companion National Association of Insurance
Commissioners’ Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual, as adopted by rule
by the commissioner.
(3) The statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section shall include the healthcare insurer's:
(A) Total assets;
(B) Total liabilities;
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(C) Total reserves;
(D)(i) Net premium income for each line of business of the
healthcare insurer.
(ii) Each line of business of the healthcare insurer
shall include:
(a) Comprehensive hospital plans and
comprehensive medical plans;
(b) Medicare supplement plans;
(c) Dental-only plans;
(d) Vision-only plans;
(e) The Federal Employees Health Benefits
Program;
(f) Medicare;
(g) Medicare Advantage Plans;
(h) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(i) Plans offered under the Medicaid Provider-
Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any successor program;
(j) Qualified health plans offered under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or any successor program;
(k) Other Medicaid plans; and
(l) Other health benefit plans;
(E)(i) Total claims paid for each line of business of the
healthcare insurer.
(ii) Each line of business of the healthcare insurer
shall include:
(a) Comprehensive hospital plans and
comprehensive medical plans;
(b) Medicare supplement plans;
(c) Dental-only plans;
(d) Vision-only plans;
(e) The Federal Employees Health Benefits
Program;
(f) Medicare;
(g) Medicare Advantage Plans;
(h) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(i) Plans offered under the Medicaid Provider-
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any successor program;
(j) Qualified health plans offered under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or any successor program;
(k) Other Medicaid plans; and
(l) Other health benefit plans;
(F)(i) Total claims denied for each line of business of
the healthcare insurer.
(ii) Each line of business of the healthcare insurer
shall include:
(a) Comprehensive hospital plans and
comprehensive medical plans;
(b) Medicare supplement plans;
(c) Dental-only plans;
(d) Vision-only plans;
(e) The Federal Employees Health Benefits
Program;
(f) Medicare;
(g) Medicare Advantage Plans;
(h) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(i) Plans offered under the Medicaid Provider-
Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any successor program;
(j) Qualified health plans offered under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or any successor program;
(k) Other Medicaid plans; and
(l) Other health benefit plans; and
(G) Low, high, and average premium price data for each
line of service of the healthcare insurer.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall file an executive summary of the
statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section with the:
(1) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(2) Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.
(c)(1) Annually, between thirty (30) and sixty (60) days before the
initial date of open enrollment for Medicare, a healthcare insurer shall make
a report available to each enrollee either by mail or other electronic means.
(2) The report required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall include:
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(A) The dollar amount of premiums collected from the
enrollee and paid to the healthcare insurer from the previous period of
January 1 through December 31;
(B) The dollar amount of premiums paid to the healthcare
insurer by a person or entity, including without limitation an employer,
other than the enrollee on behalf of the enrollee from the previous period of
January 1 through December 31;
(C) The dollar amount of cost sharing expected to be
collected by the healthcare provider, itemized by deductibles, coinsurance,
and copayments, or similar charges from the enrollee from the previous period
of January 1 through December 31;
(D) The payment made to each in-network healthcare
provider on behalf of the enrollee from the previous period of January 1
through December 31;
(E) The payment made to each out-of-network healthcare
provider on behalf of the enrollee from the previous period of January 1
through December 31;
(F) A list of claims denied to a healthcare provider who
provided healthcare services to the enrollee from the previous period of
January 1 through December 31;
(G) The low, average, and high premium rates comparable to
the enrollee’s health benefit plan;
(H) A list of any underwriting, auditing, actuarial,
financial analysis, treasury, and investment expenses;
(I) A list of any marketing and sales expenses, including
without limitation advertising, member relations, member enrollment, and all
expenses associated with producers, brokers, and benefit consultants;
(J) A list of any claims operations expenses, including
without limitation those expenses for adjudication, appeals, settlements, and
expenses associated with paying claims;
(K) A list of any medical administration expenses,
including without limitation disease management, utilization review, and
medical management;
(L) A list of any network operations expenses, including
without limitation those expenses for contracting, hospital and physician
relations, and medical policy procedures;
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(M) A list of any charitable expenses, including without
limitation to contributions to tax-exempt foundations and community benefits;
(N) The amount of state insurance premium taxes;
(O) The amount paid for board, bureau, and association
fees;
(P) The fees related to depreciation; and
(Q) A list of miscellaneous expenses described in detail
by expense, including any expense not included in subdivisions (c)(2)(H)—(P)
of this section.

23-99-1904. Prohibition on pricing increases.
(a) Before a healthcare insurer’s implementation of an increase in
premium rates, cost sharing, or per-member-per-month costs or payments for
rates or insurance policies that are required to be reviewed by the Insurance
Commissioner under §§ 23-79-109 and 23-79-110, the commissioner shall
consider the following additional factors in his or her review:
(1) The extent to which the healthcare insurer’s RBC level as
defined in § 23-63-1302 is less than six hundred fifty percent (650%); and
(2)(A) To the extent permitted by federal law, whether the
healthcare insurer’s medical loss ratio is greater than eighty-five percent
(85%) on clinical services and quality improvement.
(B) The calculation of medical claims and quality
improvements for a healthcare insurer's medical loss ratio under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section shall exclude:
(i) Any performance-based compensation, bonus, or
other financial incentive paid directly or indirectly to a contracting entity
employee, affiliate, contractor, or other entity or individual;
(ii) Any expense under § 23-99-1903(c)(2)(H)-(Q);
(iii) Any expense associated with carrying enrollee
medical debt; and
(iv) Cost sharing.
(b) A healthcare insurer in the fully insured group market shall
consider the factors in subsection (a) of this section before implementing an
increased premium rate, cost sharing, or enrollee per-member-per-month fee.

23-99-1905. Violation of Trade Practices Act — Enforcement.
04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 H4/10/25 HB1295
(a) A violation of this subchapter is a deceptive act, as defined by
the Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., and § 4-88-101 et seq.
(b) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Insurance
Commissioner under the Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., shall be
available to the commissioner for the enforcement of this subchapter.
(c) The State Insurance Department shall enforce this subchapter.

23-99-1906. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

23-99-1907. Severability.
The provisions of this section shall be severable, and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining
provisions of the section shall be enforceable.

/s/L. Johnson




















04-10-2025 09:53:45 ANS081